Hawaii statutes.
§281-32 Licenses, temporary. A
temporary license of any class and kind specified in section 281-31 may be
granted under the following conditions:

(1) The premises shall have been operated under a
license of the same class, kind, and category issued by the liquor commission
at least one year immediately prior to the date of filing of the application
for a temporary license, except as otherwise approved by the commission;

(2) The license of the same class, kind, and category
then in effect for the premises shall be surrendered in such manner and at such
time as the commission shall direct;

(3) The applicant for a temporary license shall have
filed with the commission an application for a license of the same class, kind,
and category currently or previously in effect for the premises;

(4) The application for a temporary license shall be
accompanied by a license fee in such amount as may be prescribed by the
commission. If the application is denied or withdrawn, the fee which
accompanied the application shall become a realization of the county;

(5) A temporary license shall be for a period of not
in excess of one hundred and twenty days. The license may be renewed at the
discretion of the commission for not more than one additional one hundred
twenty-day period upon payment of such additional fee as may be prescribed by
the commission and upon compliance with all conditions required in this section
and section 281-31. When a temporary license has expired and no permanent
license has been issued, the sale and service of liquor shall cease until the
permanent license is issued; provided that, when applicable, the license shall
be properly renewed;

(6) A temporary license shall authorize the licensee
to purchase liquor only by payment in currency, check, or certified check for
the liquor before or at the time of delivery of the liquor to the licensee,
except as otherwise provided by commission rule; and

(7) Sections 281-52 and 281-54 and sections 281-56 to
281-61 shall not apply to any application for a temporary license. [L 1967, c
105, §1; HRS §281-32; am L 1972, c 177, §3; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 383, §4;
am L 2008, c 168, §6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next